District of Columbia statutes.
4-1341.07

Dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in a contract or legacy transferring or loaning property to the Trust Fund, upon dissolution of the Trust Fund as a corporation, all remaining assets shall be transferred to the Mayor of the District of Columbia. The Mayor shall make every effort to use the assets for the prevention of child abuse and child neglect as provided in this subchapter.

History

Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 8, 40 DCR 7222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2137.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 4-1341.01.